Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3301
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 60-3301 to 60-3311, the following definitions apply:

(1) Automated driving system means the hardware and software that are collectively capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task on a sustained basis regardless of whether it is limited to a specific operational design domain, if any;

(2) Automated-driving-system-equipped vehicle means a motor vehicle equipped with an automated driving system;

(3) Conventional human driver means a human person who manually exercises in-vehicle braking, accelerating, steering, and transmission gear selection input devices in order to operate a motor vehicle;

(4) Department means the Department of Motor Vehicles;

(5) Driverless-capable vehicle means a motor vehicle equipped with an automated driving system capable of performing all aspects of the dynamic driving task within its operational design domain, if any, including achieving a minimal risk condition, without any intervention or supervision by a conventional human driver;

(6) Dynamic driving task means all of the real-time operational and tactical functions required to operate a motor vehicle within its specific operational design domain, if any, excluding the strategic functions such as trip scheduling and selection of destinations and waypoints;

(7) Minimal risk condition means a reasonably safe state to which an automated driving system brings an automated-driving-system-equipped vehicle upon experiencing a performance-related failure of the vehicle's automated driving system that renders the vehicle unable to perform the entire dynamic driving task, such as bringing the vehicle to a complete stop and activating the hazard lamps;

(8) On-demand driverless-capable vehicle network means a transportation service network that uses a software application or other digital means to dispatch driverless-capable vehicles for purposes of transporting persons or goods, including for-hire transportation, transportation for compensation, and public transportation; and

(9) Operational design domain means a description of the specific operating domain in which an automated driving system is designed to properly operate, including, but not limited to, roadway types, speed range, environmental conditions such as weather and time of day, and other domain constraints.

Laws 2018, LB989, § 1.